Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2451.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 204 of the act of March 4, 1971 (P.L.6, No.2), known as the Tax Reform Code of 1971, is amended by adding a clause to read:Section 204. Exclusions from Tax.--The tax imposed by section 202 shall not be imposed upon any of the following:* * *(77) The sale at retail or use of children's books, children's toys and musical instruments during the exclusion period to an individual purchaser for nonbusiness use. The 12345678910111213141516171819202122 following shall apply:(i) The department shall publish a notice on the department's publicly accessible Internet website to give guidance on the implementation of the exclusions under this clause.(ii) For the purposes of this clause:(A) "Children's books" shall mean books written and marketed by the publisher for an intended audience of individuals under 12 years of age.(B) "Children's toys" shall mean a consumer product designed or intended by the manufacturer for a child 12 years of age or younger for use by the child when the child plays.(C) "Exclusion period" shall mean the six months immediately following the effective date of this clause.(D) "Purchaser" shall mean an individual who places an order and pays the purchase price by cash or credit during the exclusion period even if delivery takes place after the exclusion period.Section 2. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026, or immediately, whichever is later.20260HB2451PN3266 - 2 - 1234567891011121314151617181920